Utah statutes.
78B-11-131.   Effect of chapter on prior agreements or proceedings.
This act does not affect an action or proceeding commenced or right accrued
before this chapter takes effect.  Subject to Section 78B-11-104 of this
chapter, an arbitration agreement made before May 6, 2002 shall be governed by
the arbitration act in force on the date the agreement was signed.
